test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuhes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - нюхәс: # Noun 'sable'
     нюхәс+N+Sg+Nom: нюхәс
     нюхәс+N+Sg+Lat: нюхәса
     нюхәс+N+Sg+Loc: нюхәсӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: нюхәсем
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: нюхәсема
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: нюхәсемӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нюхәсен
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: нюхәсена
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: нюхәсенӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нюхәслд
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: нюхәслда
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: нюхәслдӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: нюхәсемӑн
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat: нюхәсемӑна
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: нюхәсемӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: нюхәсӑн
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat: нюхәсӑна
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: нюхәсӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: нюхәсӑн
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat: нюхәсӑна
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: нюхәсӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: нюхәсев
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: нюхәсева
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: нюхәсевӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: нюхәсӑн
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: нюхәсӑна
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: нюхәсӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: нюхәсӑлд
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: нюхәсӑлда
     нюхәс+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: нюхәсӑлдӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+Nom: нюхәснгӑн
     нюхәс+N+Du+Lat: нюхәснгӑна
     нюхәс+N+Du+Loc: нюхәснгӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдам
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдама
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдамӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдан
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдана
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc: нюхәснгӑлданӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдалд
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдалда
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдалдӑн

#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдӑмӑн
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдӑмӑна
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдӑмӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдӑн
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдӑна
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдалд
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдалда
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдалдӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдув
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдува
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдувӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдӑн
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдӑна
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдӑнӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: нюхәснгӑлдалд
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat: нюхәснгӑлдалда
     нюхәс+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc: нюхәснгӑлдалдӑн
#
     нюхәс+N+Pl+Nom: нюхәсӑт
     нюхәс+N+Pl+Lat: нюхәсӑта
     нюхәс+N+Pl+Loc: нюхәсӑтӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: нюхәслдам
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: нюхәслдама
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc: нюхәслдамӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нюхәслдан
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: нюхәслдана
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: нюхәслданӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нюхәслдалд
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: нюхәслдалда
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc: нюхәслдалдӑн


     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: нюхәслдӑмӑн
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat: нюхәслдӑмӑна
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc: нюхәслдӑмӑнӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: нюхәслдӑн
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat: нюхәслдӑна
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc: нюхәслдӑнӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: нюхәслдалд
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat: нюхәслдалда
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc: нюхәслдалдӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: нюхәслдув
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: нюхәслдува
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc: нюхәслдувӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: нюхәслдӑн
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: нюхәслдӑна
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc: нюхәслдӑнӑн

     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нюхәслдалд
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: нюхәслдалда
     нюхәс+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: нюхәслдалдӑн
